California statutes. Public Resources Code
 not include those required to be undertaken pursuant to state or federal law or regulations, air district rules or regulations, memoranda of understanding with a governmental entity, or legally binding agreements or documents. The State Air Resources Board shall advise the authority to ensure that the requirements of this clause are met.

(2) (A) “Advanced transportation technologies” means emerging commercially competitive transportation-related technologies identified by the authority as capable of creating long-term, high-value-added jobs for Californians while enhancing the state’s commitment to energy conservation, pollution and greenhouse gas emissions reduction, and transportation efficiency.

(B) “Advanced transportation technologies” does not include those
 projects required to be undertaken pursuant to state or federal law or regulations, air district rules or regulations, memoranda of understanding with a governmental entity, or legally binding agreements or documents. The State Air Resources Board shall advise the authority regarding projects that are excluded pursuant to this subparagraph.

(3) (A) “Alternative sources” means devices or technologies used for a renewable electrical generation facility, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 25741, devices or technologies used for an electrical generation facility that uses nuclear fusion technology, a combined heat and power system, as defined in Section 2840.2 of the Public Utilities Code, distributed generation and energy storage technologies eligible under the self-generation incentive program
 pursuant to Section 379.6 of the Public Utilities Code, as determined by the Public Utilities Commission, or a facility designed for the production of renewable fuels, the efficient use of which reduces the use of fossil or nuclear fuels, and energy efficiency devices or technologies that reduce the need for new electric generation and reduce emissions of toxic and criteria pollutants and greenhouse gases.

(B) “Alternative sources” does not include a hydroelectric facility that does not meet state laws pertaining to the control, appropriation, use, and distribution of water, including, but not limited to, the obtaining of applicable licenses and permits.

(4) “Authority” means the California Alternative Energy and Advanced Transportation Financing Authority established pursuant to
 Section 26004, and any board, commission, department, or officer succeeding to the functions of the authority, or to which the powers conferred upon the authority by this division shall be given.

(5) “Cost” as applied to a project or portion of the project financed under this division means all or part of the cost of construction and acquisition of all lands, structures, real or personal property or an interest in the real or personal property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and interests acquired or used for a project; the cost of demolishing or removing any buildings or structures on land so acquired, including the cost of acquiring any lands to which those buildings or structures may be moved; the cost of all machinery, equipment, and furnishings, financing charges, interest prior to, during, and for a period after, completion
 of construction as determined by the authority; provisions for working capital; reserves for principal and interest and for extensions, enlargements, additions, replacements, renovations, and improvements; the cost of architectural, engineering, financial, accounting, auditing and legal services, plans, specifications, estimates, administrative expenses, and other expenses necessary or incidental to determining the feasibility of constructing any project or incidental to the construction, acquisition, or financing of a project.

(6) “Financial assistance” includes, but is not limited to, loans, loan loss reserves, interest rate reductions, proceeds of bonds issued by the authority, bond insurance, loan guarantees or other credit enhancements or liquidity facilities, contributions of money, or a combination thereof, as determined by, and
 approved by the resolution of, the board.

(7) (A) “Participating party” means a person, federal or state agency, department, board, authority, or commission, state or community college, or university, or a city or county, regional agency, public district, school district, or other political entity engaged in the business or operations in the state, whether organized for profit or not for profit, that applies for financial assistance from the authority for the purpose of implementing a project.

(B) (i) For purposes of Section 6010.8 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, “participating party” means an entity specified in subparagraph (A) that seeks financial assistance pursuant to Section 26011.8.

(ii) For purposes of Section 6010.8 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, an entity located outside of the state, including an entity located overseas, is considered to be a participating party and is eligible to apply for financial assistance pursuant to Section 26011.8 if the participating party commits to, and demonstrates that, the party will be opening a manufacturing facility in the state.

(iii) It is the intent of the Legislature by adding clause (ii) to clarify existing law and ensure that an out-of-state entity or overseas entity is eligible to apply for financial assistance pursuant to Section 26011.8.

(8) (A) “Project” means a land, building, improvement to the land or building, rehabilitation, work, property, or structure, real or personal,
 stationary or mobile, including, but not limited to, machinery and equipment utilized in the state, whether or not in existence or under construction, that utilizes, or is designed to utilize, an alternative source, or that is utilized for the design, technology transfer, manufacture, production, assembly, distribution, or service of advanced transportation technologies or alternative source components.

(B) “Project,” for purposes of Section 26011.8 and Section 6010.8 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, is defined in Section 26011.8.

(9) “Revenue” means all rents, receipts, purchase payments, loan repayments, and all other income or receipts derived by the authority from a project, or the sale, lease, or other disposition of alternative source or advanced transportation technology
 facilities, or the making of loans to finance alternative source or advanced transportation technology facilities, and any income or revenue derived from the investment of money in any fund or account of the authority.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 690, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 211, Sec. 1.   (SB 86)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 211.)
-------------------------------------------

26003.

(a) As used in this division, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) (A) “Advanced transportation technologies” means emerging commercially competitive transportation-related technologies identified by the authority as capable of creating long-term, high-value-added jobs for Californians while enhancing the state’s commitment to energy conservation, pollution and greenhouse gas emissions reduction, and transportation efficiency.

(B) “Advanced transportation technologies” does not include those projects required to be undertaken pursuant to state or federal law or regulations, air district rules or
 regulations, memoranda of understanding with a governmental entity, or legally binding agreements or documents. The State Air Resources Board shall advise the authority regarding projects that are excluded pursuant to this subparagraph.

(2) (A) “Alternative sources” means devices or technologies used for a renewable electrical generation facility, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 25741, a combined heat and power system, as defined in Section 2840.2 of the Public Utilities Code, distributed generation and energy storage technologies eligible under the self-generation incentive program pursuant to Section 379.6 of the Public Utilities Code, as determined by the Public Utilities Commission, or a facility designed for the production of renewable fuels, the efficient use of which reduces the
 use of fossil or nuclear fuels, and energy efficiency devices or technologies that reduce the need for new electric generation and reduce emissions of toxic and criteria pollutants and greenhouse gases.

(B) “Alternative sources” does not include a hydroelectric facility that does not meet state laws pertaining to the control, appropriation, use, and distribution of water, including, but not limited to, the obtaining of applicable licenses and permits.

(3) “Authority” means the California Alternative Energy and Advanced Transportation Financing Authority established pursuant to Section 26004, and any board, commission, department, or officer succeeding to the functions of the authority, or to which the powers conferred upon the authority by this division shall be given.

(4) “Cost” as applied to a project or portion of the project financed under this division means all or part of the cost of construction and acquisition of all lands, structures, real or personal property or an interest in the real or personal property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and interests acquired or used for a project; the cost of demolishing or removing any buildings or structures on land so acquired, including the cost of acquiring any lands to which those buildings or structures may be moved; the cost of all machinery, equipment, and furnishings, financing charges, interest prior to, during, and for a period after, completion of construction as determined by the authority; provisions for working capital; reserves for principal and interest and for extensions, enlargements, additions, replacements, renovations, and
 improvements; the cost of architectural, engineering, financial, accounting, auditing and legal services, plans, specifications, estimates, administrative expenses, and other expenses necessary or incidental to determining the feasibility of constructing any project or incidental to the construction, acquisition, or financing of a project.

(5) “Financial assistance” includes, but is not limited to, loans, loan loss reserves, interest rate reductions, proceeds of bonds issued by the authority, bond insurance, loan guarantees or other credit enhancements or liquidity facilities, contributions of money, or a combination thereof, as determined by, and approved by the resolution of, the board.

(6) (A) “Participating party” means a person, federal or state agency,
 department, board, authority, or commission, state or community college, or university, or a city or county, regional agency, public district, school district, or other political entity engaged in the business or operations in the state, whether organized for profit or not for profit, that applies for financial assistance from the authority for the purpose of implementing a project.

(B) (i) For purposes of Section 6010.8 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, “participating party” means an entity specified in subparagraph (A) that seeks financial assistance pursuant to Section 26011.8.

(ii) For purposes of Section 6010.8 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, an entity located outside of the state, including an entity located overseas, is considered to be a
 participating party and is eligible to apply for financial assistance pursuant to Section 26011.8 if the participating party commits to, and demonstrates that, the party will be opening a manufacturing facility in the state.

(iii) It is the intent of the Legislature by adding clause (ii) to clarify existing law and ensure that an out-of-state entity or overseas entity is eligible to apply for financial assistance pursuant to Section 26011.8.

(7) (A) “Project” means a land, building, improvement to the land or building, rehabilitation, work, property, or structure, real or personal, stationary or mobile, including, but not limited to, machinery and equipment utilized in the state, whether or not in existence or under construction, that utilizes, or is designed to utilize,
 an alternative source, or that is utilized for the design, technology transfer, manufacture, production, assembly, distribution, or service of advanced transportation technologies or alternative source components.

(B) “Project,” for purposes of Section 26011.8 and Section 6010.8 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, is defined in Section 26011.8.

(8) “Revenue” means all rents, receipts, purchase payments, loan repayments, and all other income or receipts derived by the authority from a project, or the sale, lease, or other disposition of
 alternative source or advanced transportation technology facilities, or the making of loans to finance alternative source or advanced transportation technology facilities, and any income or revenue derived from the investment of money in any fund or account of the authority.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 690, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 211, Sec. 2.   (SB 86)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Organization of Authority and General Powers and Duties Thereof [26004. - 26017.]

26004.

(a) There is in the state government the California Alternative Energy and Advanced Transportation Financing Authority. The authority constitutes a public instrumentality and the exercise by the authority of powers conferred by this division is the performance of an essential public function.

(b) The authority shall consist of five members, as follows:

(1) The Director of Finance.

(2) The Chairperson of the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission.

(3) The President of the Public Utilities Commission.

(4) The Controller.

(5) The Treasurer, who shall serve as the chairperson of the authority.

(c) The members listed in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) may each designate a deputy or clerk in his or her agency to act for and represent the member at all meetings of the authority.

(d) The first meeting of the authority shall be convened by the Treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1218, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

26005.

All members of the authority shall serve thereon without compensation as members of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 908, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

26006.

The provisions of this division shall be administered by the authority which shall have and is hereby vested with all powers reasonably necessary to carry out the powers and responsibilities expressly granted or imposed upon it under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 908, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

26007.

The authority shall maintain an office in the City of Sacramento.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 908, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

26008.

The authority may employ an executive director and any other persons as are necessary to enable it properly to perform the duties imposed upon it by this division. The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the authority and shall receive such compensation as shall be fixed by the authority. The authority may, by resolution, delegate to its executive director, or any other employee of the authority, or the Treasurer’s designee any powers and duties that it may deem proper, including, but not limited to, the power to enter into contracts on behalf of the authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 677, Sec. 7.   (SB 1128)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

26009.

The authority may adopt, amend, or repeal all rules and regulations necessary to carry out this division as emergency regulations in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption, amendment, or repeal of the regulations is conclusively presumed to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare within the meaning of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 677, Sec. 8.   (SB 1128)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

26010.

(a) The Attorney General shall be the legal counsel for the authority, but with the approval of the Attorney General, the authority may employ such legal counsel as in its judgment is necessary or advisable to enable it to carry out the duties and functions imposed upon it by this division, including the employment of such bond counsel as may be deemed advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of bonds.

(b) The Director of Finance shall be the treasurer of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 908, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

26011.

The authority is authorized and empowered:

(a) To adopt an official seal.

(b) To sue and be sued in its own name.

(c) To issue bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes, and other obligations of the authority, including, at the option of the authority, obligations bearing interest that is taxable for purposes of federal income taxation, for any of its purposes and to fund or refund the same, all as provided in this division.

(d) To determine the location and character of a project to be financed under the provisions of this
 division, to provide financial assistance to a participating party, to enter into loan agreements with a participating party for the financing of a project including creating a lien or security interest in the property, to construct, reconstruct, renovate, replace, lease, as lessor or lessee, and regulate the same, and to enter into contracts for the sale of a project, including installment sales or sales under conditional sales contracts.

(e) To fix fees and charges for projects, and interest rates with respect to loans for projects or for loan of moneys to finance projects, and to revise from time to time the fees and charges and interest rates, and to collect rates, rents, fees, loan repayments, and charges for the use of, and for a facility or service furnished, or to be furnished, by a project or part of the project and to contract with a
 person, partnership, association, corporation, or public agency with respect to the project, and to fix the terms and conditions upon which a project may be sold or disposed of, whether upon installment sales contracts or otherwise.

(f) To employ and fix the compensation of bond counsel, financial consultants, and advisers as may be necessary in its judgment in connection with the issuance and sale of any bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes, or other obligations of the authority; to contract to advance the purposes of this division.

(g) To purchase, with proceeds of its bonds or its revenue, bonds issued by a public agency at a public or negotiated sale. Bonds purchased pursuant to this subdivision may be held by the authority or sold to public or private purchasers at public or
 negotiated sales, in whole or in part, separately or together with other bonds issued by the authority.

(h) To do all things generally necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 677, Sec. 9.   (SB 1128)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

26011.8.

(a) The purpose of this section is to promote the creation of California-based manufacturing, high-quality California-based jobs, advanced manufacturing, the reduction of greenhouse gases, or reductions in air and water pollution or energy consumption, and to ensure that California communities and workers benefit from projects receiving financial assistance pursuant to this section. In furtherance of this purpose, the authority may approve a project for financial assistance in the
 form of the sales and use tax exclusion established in Section 6010.8 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Project” means tangible personal property if at least 50 percent of its use is either to process recycled feedstock that is intended to be reused in the production of another product or using recycled feedstock in the production of another product or soil amendment, or tangible personal property that is used in the state for the design, manufacture, production, or assembly of advanced manufacturing, advanced transportation technologies, or alternative source products, components, or systems, as defined in Section 26003. “Project” does not include tangible personal property that processes
 or uses recycled feedstock in a manner that would constitute disposal as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 40192.

(2) “Recycled feedstock” means materials that would otherwise be destined for disposal, having completed their intended end use and product lifecycle.

(3) “Soil amendments” may include “compost,” as defined in Section 14525 of the Food and Agricultural Code, “fertilizing material,” as defined in Section 14533 of the Food and Agricultural Code, “gypsum” or “phosphatic sulfate gypsum,” as those terms are defined in Section 14537 of the Food and Agricultural Code, or a substance distributed for the purpose of promoting plant growth or improving the quality of crops by conditioning soils through physical means.

(c) The authority shall publish notice of the availability of project applications and deadlines for submission of project applications to the authority.

(d) The authority shall evaluate a project application based on all of the following criteria:

(1) The extent to which the project develops manufacturing facilities, or purchases equipment for manufacturing facilities, located in California.

(2) The extent to which the anticipated benefit to the state from the project equals or exceeds the projected benefit to the participating party from the sales and use tax exclusion.

(3) The extent to which the project will create new, or result in the
 loss of, permanent, full-time jobs in California, including the average and minimum wage for each classification of full-time employees proposed to be hired or not retained.

(4) To the extent feasible, the extent to which the project, or the product produced by the project, results in a reduction of greenhouse gases, a reduction in air or water pollution, an increase in energy efficiency, or a reduction in energy consumption, beyond what is required by federal or state law or regulation.

(5) The extent of unemployment in the area in which the project is proposed to be located.

(6) Any other factors the authority deems appropriate in accordance with this section.

(e) On or after January 1, 2026, for an applicant that, together with its parent corporation and subsidiaries, employs 500 or more employees, the authority shall not approve a project for financial assistance pursuant to this section unless the applicant certifies, in a manner designated by the authority, that the applicant and its contractors will do all of the following:

(1) Provide comparatively good wage and benefits to the employees of the applicant or its subcontractors, relative to the industrial sector of the applicant or its subcontractors, occupation, and labor market of those employees.

(2) Invest in employee training, growth, and development, such as through comprehensive workforce training programs or apprenticeship programs.

(3) Adopt
 mechanisms to include worker voice and agency in the workplace.

(f) At a duly noticed public hearing, the authority shall approve, by resolution, project applications for financial assistance.

(g) Without regard to the actual date of any transaction between a
 participating party and the authority, any project approved by the authority by resolution for the sales and use tax exclusion pursuant to Section 6010.8 of the Revenue and Taxation Code before March 24, 2010, shall not be subject to this section.

(h) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the exclusions granted pursuant to Section 6010.8 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for projects approved by the authority pursuant to this section shall not exceed one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) for each calendar year.

(2) For the 2022, 2023, and 2024 calendar years, the exclusions granted pursuant to Section 6010.8 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for projects approved by the authority pursuant to this section shall not exceed one hundred fifteen million dollars ($115,000,000), of which fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) shall be made available only to projects that manufacture, refine, extract, process, or recover lithium. In evaluating applications for projects that manufacture, refine, extract, process, or recover lithium, the authority, in addition to the criteria in subdivision (d), may consider other factors, including, but not limited to, the grantee’s willingness to relocate projects into California from a state that has enacted a law that does any of the following:

(A) Has the effect of voiding or repealing existing state protections
 against discrimination on the basis of sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression.

(B) Authorizes or requires discrimination against same-sex couples or their families or on the basis of sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression.

(C) Creates an exemption to antidiscrimination laws in order to permit discrimination against same-sex couples or their families or on the basis of sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression.

(D) Has the effect of denying or interfering with a woman’s right to choose to bear a child or to choose and obtain an abortion, as provided by Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 123460) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(i) The authority shall study the efficacy and cost benefit of the sales and use tax exclusion as it relates to advanced manufacturing projects. The study shall include the number of jobs created, the costs of each job, and the annual salary of each job. The study shall also consider a dynamic analysis of the economic output to the state that would occur without the sales and use tax exclusion.

(j) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 21) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 211, Sec. 3.   (SB 86)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 211.)
-------------------------------------------

26011.8.

(a) The sale or purchase of tangible personal property of a project approved pursuant to this section, as it reads on December 31, 2027, before January 1, 2028, shall continue to be excluded from sales and use taxes pursuant to Section 6010.8 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for the period of time set forth in the authority’s resolution approving the project pursuant to this section.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Project” means tangible personal property if at least 50 percent of its use is either to process recycled feedstock that is intended to be reused in
 the production of another product or using recycled feedstock in the production of another product or soil
 amendment, or tangible personal property that is used in the state for the design, manufacture, production, or assembly of advanced manufacturing, advanced transportation technologies, or alternative source products, components, or systems, as defined in Section 26003. “Project” does not include tangible personal property that processes or uses recycled feedstock in a manner that would constitute disposal as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 40192.

(2) “Recycled feedstock” means materials that would otherwise be destined for disposal, having completed their intended end use and product lifecycle.

(3) “Soil amendments” may include “compost,” as defined in Section 14525 of the Food and Agricultural Code, “fertilizing material,” as defined in Section 14533 of the Food
 and Agricultural Code, “gypsum” or “phosphatic sulfate gypsum,” as those terms are defined in Section 14537 of the Food and Agricultural Code, or a substance distributed for the purpose of promoting plant growth or improving the quality of crops by conditioning soils through physical means.

(c) The exclusions granted pursuant to Section 6010.8 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for projects approved by the authority pursuant to this section, as it reads on December 31, 2027, before January 1, 2028, shall not exceed one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) for each calendar year.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2028.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 690, Sec. 6) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 211, Sec. 4.   (SB 86)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

26014.

When the principal of and interest on bonds of the authority issued to finance or refund the cost of a particular project for a participating party shall have been fully paid and retired or when adequate provision shall have been made for the payment and retirement of the same, and all other conditions of the resolution, indenture, or agreement authorizing and securing the same shall have been satisfied and the lien of such resolution, indenture, or agreement shall have been released in accordance with the provisions thereof, the authority is authorized, upon such terms and conditions as may be prescribed by the authority, to execute such deeds and conveyances as are necessary or required to convey title to such project to such
 participating party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 677, Sec. 16.   (SB 1128)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

26015.

(a) The authority, or the executive director of the authority, if authorized to do so by resolution of the authority, shall take official action towards the issuance of bonds with respect to any participating party at the next meeting of the authority occurring more than 30 days following receipt of such application or if by the executive director within 45 days of such receipt. The executive director may be authorized to take such action in a resolution of general authority. Official action towards the issuance of bonds may reserve the right of the authority to further review an application for financing and to consider the terms thereof prior to the issuance of bonds therefor.

(b) The authority shall take final action to approve or disapprove of the issuance of bonds or notes to lend financial assistance to participating parties within 60 days of the receipt by the authority of a request from such participating party for such action. Any such request by a participating party for such final action shall be accompanied by evidence of fulfillment of any and all conditions to the issuance of such bonds or notes imposed at the time the first action towards the issuance thereof was taken by the authority and by copies of forms of all principal legal documents to be approved by the authority.

(c) The authority may give final approval for the issuance of such bonds or notes upon such terms as it reasonably deems necessary or desirable.

(d) Any action under this section shall be at the sole discretion of the authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 677, Sec. 17.   (SB 1128)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

26017.

The authority, no later than March 31 of each year, shall submit to the Legislature a report of its activities for the preceding calendar year ending December 31. Such report shall include (a) a listing of the applications received, (b) a listing of the applications accepted for financing, (c) a specification of bonds sold, interest rates thereon, and whether bond sales were pursuant to public bid or were negotiated, (d) a specification of the amount of bonds authorized but currently unsold, (e) a projection of the authority’s needs and requirements for the coming year, and (f) a report of revenues and expenditures for the preceding fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 677, Sec. 20.   (SB 1128)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Bonds and Notes [26022. - 26025.]

26022.

(a) The authority is authorized from time to time to issue its negotiable bonds, notes, debentures, or other securities (hereinafter collectively called “bonds”) for any of its purposes. The bonds may be authorized, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, to finance a single project for a single participating party, a series of projects for a single participating party, a single project for several participating parties, or several projects for several participating parties, or the purchase and sale of alternative source energy or projects pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 26011. The authority may issue negotiable bond anticipation notes and may renew the notes from time to time. The bond
 anticipation notes may be paid from the proceeds of sale of the bonds of the authority in anticipation of which they were issued. Notes and agreements relating to the notes and bond anticipation notes, collectively called notes, and the resolution or resolutions authorizing the notes may contain any provisions, conditions, or limitations that a bond, agreement relating to the bond, and bond resolution of the authority may contain. However, a note or renewal of the note shall mature at a time not exceeding three years from the date of issue of the original note.

(b) Except as may otherwise be expressly provided by the authority, every issue of its bonds, notes, or other obligations shall be general obligations of the authority payable from any revenues or moneys of the authority available for these purposes and not otherwise pledged,
 subject only to any agreements with the holders of particular bonds, notes, or other obligations pledging any particular revenues or moneys and subject to any agreements with any participating party. Notwithstanding that the bonds, notes, or other obligations may be payable from a special fund, they are for all purposes negotiable instruments, subject only to the provisions of the bonds, notes, or other obligations for registration.

(c) The bonds may be issued as serial bonds or as term bonds, or the authority, in its discretion, may issue bonds of both types. The bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the authority and shall bear the date or dates, mature at the time or times, not exceeding 50 years from their respective dates, bear interest at the fixed rate or rates, or at the variable rates, including multiple methods of setting rates
 from time to time while the bonds are outstanding, be payable at the time or times, be in the denominations, be executed in a manner, be payable in lawful money of the United States of America at a place or places, and be subject to terms of redemption or tender, as the resolution or resolutions may provide. The bonds or notes shall be sold by the Treasurer as agent for sale. The sales may be a public or private sale, and for the price or prices and on the terms and conditions, as the authority shall determine after giving due consideration to the recommendations of any participating party to be assisted from the proceeds of the bonds or notes. Pending preparation of the definitive bonds, the Treasurer may issue interim receipts, certificates, or temporary bonds that shall be exchanged for the definitive bonds. The Treasurer may sell bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness at a price below
 their par value. However, the discount on a security sold pursuant to this section shall not exceed 6 percent of the par value.

(d) A resolution or resolutions authorizing bonds or an issue of bonds may contain provisions that shall be a part of the contract with the holders of the bonds or any credit provider to be authorized, as to all of the following:

(1) Pledging the full faith and credit of the authority or pledging all or part of the revenues of a project or a revenue-producing contract or contracts made by the authority with an individual, partnership, corporation, or association or other body, public or private, or other moneys of the authority, to secure the payment of the bonds or of any particular issue of bonds, subject to the agreements with bondholders as may
 then exist.

(2) The rentals, fees, purchase payments, loan repayments, and other charges to be charged, and the amounts to be raised in each year by the charges, and the use and disposition of the revenues.

(3) The setting aside of reserves or sinking funds, and the regulation and disposition of the reserves or sinking funds.

(4) Limitations on the right of the authority or its agent to restrict and regulate the use of the project or projects to be financed out of the proceeds of the bonds or any particular issue of bonds.

(5) Limitations on the purpose to which the proceeds of sale of an issue of bonds then or thereafter to be issued may be applied and pledging those
 proceeds to secure the payment of the bonds or the issue of the bonds.

(6) Limitations on the issuance of additional bonds, the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and secured, and the refunding of outstanding bonds.

(7) The procedure, if any, by which the terms of a contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent to the amendment or abrogation, and the manner in which that consent may be given.

(8) Limitations on expenditures for operating, administrative, or other expenses of the authority.

(9) Defining the acts or omissions to act that constitute a default in the duties of the
 authority to holders of its obligations and providing the rights and remedies of the holders in the event of a default.

(10) The mortgaging of a project and the site of the project for the purpose of securing the bondholders.

(11) The mortgaging of land, improvements, or other assets owned by a participating party for the purpose of securing the bondholders.

(12) Provisions for the security of any provider of credit enhancement supporting payment on the bonds, but only in a manner subordinate to the right of bondholders.

(e) Neither the members of the authority nor a person executing the bonds or notes shall be liable personally on the bonds or notes or
 be subject to personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance of the bond or note.

(f) The authority shall have power out of any funds available for these purposes to purchase its bonds or notes without the cancellation thereof. The authority may hold, pledge, cancel, or resell those bonds, subject to and in accordance with agreements with bondholders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 677, Sec. 23.   (SB 1128)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

26023.
